North Dakota, session 69, HB1047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 29-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Juror counseling following graphic evidence or testimony.
1. The court shall offer, not more than ten hours of post-trial psychological counseling, without
charge, to a juror or alternate juror who served on a trial jury in a trial involving extraordinarily
graphic, gruesome, or emotional evidence or testimony.
2. The counseling offered under subsection 1 applies only to a juror or alternate juror who served
on a trial jury for a trial involving the following offenses:
a. Murder under section 12.1 - 16 - 01 ;
b. Manslaughter under section 12.1 - 16 - 02 ;
c. Negligent homicide under section 12.1 - 16 - 03 ;
d. Felony-level assault or domestic violence under chapter 12.1 - 17 ;
e. A sexual offense under chapter 12.1 - 20 or 12.1 - 27.2 ;
f. Abuse or neglect of a child under sections 14 - 09 - 22 and 14 - 09 - 22.1; and
g. Others as determined by the court.
3. The counseling offered under this section:
a. Must occur not later than one hundred eighty days after the jury is discharged;
b. May be provided by the court system, by a state agency, or by contract; and
c. May be individual or group counseling.

H. B. NO. 1047 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1047.
House Vote: Yeas 80 Nays 11 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 32 Nays 13 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State